Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 413.234 is amended to read:
413.234. (1) As used in ORS 413.234 and 413.235:
(a) “Emergency  medical services” means the services provided by emergency medical services
providers to an individual experiencing a medical emergency in order to:
(A) Assess, treat and stabilize the individual’s medical condition; or
(B) Prepare and transport the individual by ground to a medical facility.
(b) “Emergency medical services provider” or “provider”  means an entity that employs individ-
uals who are licensed by the Oregon Health Authority under  ORS chapter 682 to provide emergency
medical services and that is owned or operated by a local government, a state agency or a federally
recognized Indian tribe.
(c) “Federal financial participation” means the portion of medical assistance expenditures  for
emergency medical services that are paid or reimbursed by the Centers for Medicare and  Medicaid
Services in accordance with the state plan for medical assistance.
(d) “Local government” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.116.
(2) To the extent allowed by federal law and  upon request,  an emergency medical services
provider that has entered into a provider agreement with the authority or a contract with a  coor-
dinated care organization is  eligible to receive Medicaid supplemental reimbursement from the au-
thority or coordinated  care organization for the cost of providing emergency medical services to a
medical assistance recipient.  The Medicaid supplemental reimbursement shall be added to the pay-
ment by the authority or coordinated  care organization for the emergency medical services as per-
mitted by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
(3)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this  subsection, the Medicaid supplemental re-
imbursement paid to an emergency medical services provider shall be equal  to the amount of federal
financial participation received by the authority for the provider’s cost  for the emergency medical
services.
(b) The Medicaid supplemental reimbursement paid to  a provider under this section may not
exceed the provider’s actual costs for the emergency  medical services, determined in accordance
with standards established by the authority, less the amount of  reimbursement that the provider is
eligible to receive from all public and private sources.
Enrolled House Bill 4156 (HB 4156-A) Page 1
(4) An emergency medical services  provider shall make readily available to the authority doc-
umentation, data and  certifications, as prescribed by the authority, necessary to establish that the
emergency medical services expenditures qualify for federal financial participation and  to calculate
the amount of Medicaid supplemental reimbursement that is due.
(5)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b)  of this subsection, the authority shall modify the
method for calculating or paying the Medicaid supplemental reimbursement if modification is nec-
essary to ensure that emergency medical services expenditures  qualify for federal financial partic-
ipation.
(b) This section does not authorize the payment of Medicaid supplemental  reimbursement to an
emergency medical services  provider if the provider has not entered into a provider agreement with
the authority, or a  contract with a coordinated care organization, to serve medical assistance re-
cipients.
(c) If the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services approves  the implementation of this sec-
tion and later revokes its approval or expresses its intent to revoke or refuse to renew its  approval,
the authority shall report the fact at the next convening of the interim or regular  session commit-
tees of the Legislative Assembly related to health care.
(6) General Fund moneys may not be used to  implement this section , except as necessary to
certify an expenditure as  eligible for federal financial participation. As a condition of receiving
Medicaid supplemental reimbursement, an emergency medical services provider  must enter into and
comply with an agreement with the authority to reimburse the authority for the  costs of adminis-
tering this section.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 413.235 is amended to read:
413.235. (1) To the extent allowed by federal law,  the Oregon  Health Authority shall develop
and implement [ an intergovernmental transfer program ] a funding mechanism to provide for the
transfer of  funds [ from] between an emergency medical services provider [ to] and the authority to
pay the costs of providing emergency medical services to members of a coordinated care organiza-
tion. The authority shall pay any federal financial participation  received by the authority as a re-
sult of the transfer of funds to the coordinated care organization. The  coordinated care organization
shall increase, [ by the same amount ] by an amount specified by the authority , the amount  of re-
imbursement paid to the emergency medical services provider for the costs of the emergency medical
services.
(2) The increased reimbursement paid under subsection (1)  of this section shall be at least
actuarially equivalent to the Medicaid supplemental reimbursement for the emergency  medical ser-
vices paid under ORS 413.234.
(3) General Fund moneys may not be used to  implement this section , except as necessary to
certify an expenditure as eligible for federal financial participation . As a condition  of [ partic-
ipation in the intergovernmental transfer program ] receiving the increased reimbursement de-
scribed  in  subsection (1) of this section, an emergency medical services provider must [ agree to pay
a fee ] enter into and comply  with an agreement with the authority  to reimburse the authority
for the costs of administering the program. [ The fee ] Any fee prescribed by the authority  under
this subsection  may not exceed 20 percent of  the cost of the emergency medical services provided.
The authority shall allow up to 120 percent of the fee to be counted as an  operating cost for pro-
viders.
(4) An emergency medical services provider shall make readily available  to the authority doc-
umentation, data and certifications, as prescribed by the authority, necessary to establish  that the
emergency medical services  expenditures qualify for federal financial participation and to calculate
the amount due to a coordinated care organization for the expenditures.
(5) If the authority determines that any expenditure made  by an emergency medical services
provider does not qualify for federal financial participation, the authority shall return the  funds
associated with the expenditure to the provider or [ refuse to accept the transfer  of funds associated
with the expenditure ] exclude the expenditure before submitting a request for federal  financial
participation.
Enrolled House Bill 4156 (HB 4156-A) Page 2
(6) Participation by  any coordinated care organization or emergency medical services provider
in the program must be voluntary.
(7) The authority shall consult with  emergency medical services providers in the development,
implementation and operation of the [ intergovernmental transfer  program ] funding mechanism de-
scribed in subsection (1) of this section .
SECTION 3. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House February 20, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 3, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4156 (HB 4156-A) Page 3